California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Up to five counties selected by the department, and at the discretion of the counties, may implement a countywide program for licensed family homes and relative caregivers receiving payments under this chapter under which they may receive reimbursement for the cost of licensed child care for each foster child under 13 years of age in the care of the licensed family home or the relative caregiver, during any period that any of the following apply:

(1) The foster parent or
 relative caregiver is working outside the home.

(2) The foster parent or relative caregiver is participating in foster care training.

(3) The foster parent or relative caregiver is fulfilling necessary foster care-related administrative duties, such as conferences and judicial reviews that are not ordinarily parental duties.

(b) A foster family home shall only receive a reimbursement for child care that is provided by a licensed provider and if an agreement has been documented in the child’s case plan.

(c) The cost for reimbursements authorized by this section shall be shared equally between the state and the county. Funds appropriated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5 shall not be used to meet the county match requirement
 under this section.

(d) The department shall, in consultation with participating counties, establish rates of child care reimbursement under this section.

(e) Of the five counties to be selected, the department shall select, at minimum, one large county, one medium county, and one small county, based on population size if a county from each category submits a written expression of its desire to participate. In addition, the department shall give priority to any county that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The county has experienced a net loss in the total number of licensed foster family homes.

(2) The county has demonstrated a deficit in the number of licensed foster family beds for the county’s population of foster children requiring
 out-of-home placement.

(f) Each participating county shall report to the department on an annual basis. The information to be reported to the department shall be determined by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Director’s Association. At a minimum, the annual report shall include the number of foster parents claiming a child care reimbursement, the number of children served under this section, and an analysis of the impact of the child care reimbursement on the recruitment and retention of licensed foster home providers. The department shall provide the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature with a report of the use of child care pursuant to this section on or before June 30, 2003.

(g) The department may issue emergency regulations for the purpose of implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 43.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.

For purposes of this section to Section 11469.3, inclusive, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Provider” shall mean a group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, a foster family agency, and similar foster care business entities.

(b) “Audit determination” has the same meaning as “audit finding.”

(c) “Financial audit” means an audit conducted by a qualified, independent certified public accountant with an audit designation engaged by the provider and submitted to the department for review.

(d) “Fiscal audit” means an audit conducted by the department pursuant to Part 200
 (commencing with Section 200.0) of Chapter II of Subtitle A of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as implemented by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in Part 75 (commencing with Section 75.1) of Subchapter A of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including uniform administrative requirements, cost principles, and audit requirements, as specifically implemented in Section 75.106 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) “Performance audit” means an audit conducted by the department to assess provider compliance with performance standards and outcome measures as set forth in Sections 11469, 11469.1, 11469.2, and 11469.3.

(f) (1) “Program audit” means an audit conducted by the department of ongoing provider programs to determine whether the program
 is providing the level of services and maintaining the documentation to support the paid rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 33.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.01.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2017, a provisional rate shall be set for both of the following providers:

(1) A new short-term residential therapeutic program provider.

(2) A new foster family agency provider.

(b) (1) The provisional rate shall be
 subject to terms and conditions, including the duration of the provisional period, set by the department.

(2) For a provider described in subdivision (a), a provisional rate may be granted for a period of up to 24 months from the date the provider’s license was issued.

(c) In determining whether to grant, and upon what conditions to grant, a provisional rate, the department shall consider factors including all of the following:

(1) Any licensing history for any license with which the program, or its directors or officers, have been associated.

(2) Any financial, fiscal, or compliance audit history with which the program, or its directors or officers, have been associated.

(3) Outstanding civil penalties or overpayments with which the program, or its directors or officers, have been associated.

(4) Any violations of state or federal law.

(d) In determining whether to continue, and upon what conditions to continue, a provisional rate, the department shall consider those factors specified in subdivision (c), as well as compliance with the terms, conditions, and requirements during the provisional period.

(e) In determining whether, at the end of the provisional rate period or thereafter, to grant a rate and whether to impose or continue, and upon what conditions to impose or continue, a probationary rate the department shall consider the factors specified in
 subdivision (c).

(f) The department shall establish an administrative review process for determinations, including denial, rate reduction, probation, and termination of the provisional and probationary rates. This process shall include a departmental review, corrective action, and a protest with the department. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), this process shall be disseminated by written directive pending the promulgation of regulations.

(g) (1) (A) For the purposes of this section, a “provisional rate” is a prospective rate given to a provider described in subdivision (a) based on an assurance to perform in accordance with terms and conditions attached to the granting of the provisional
 rate.

(B) For the purposes of this section, a “probationary rate” is a rate upon which limitations and conditions are imposed as a result of violations of terms, conditions, or state or federal law, including those set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) (A) At the conclusion of a provisional rate, a probationary rate may be imposed, at the discretion of the department, if additional oversight is deemed necessary based on the provider’s performance during the provisional rate period.

(B) At any time, a rate may become a probationary rate if additional oversight is deemed necessary based on the provider’s performance in accordance with terms and conditions attached to the granting or maintenance of its rate.

(C) A probationary
 rate may be accompanied by a rate reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 34.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.1.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt regulations that specify the type of information requested from providers, including reasonable timeframes. All providers shall upon request of the department for any records, or for any information contained in records pertaining to an individual program, make the requested records or information available to the department for inspection or copying. The information required to be made available pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, information necessary to establish a rate, collect provider sustained overpayments in a timely and efficient manner, or to perform a financial, fiscal, performance, or program audit. This section shall not be construed to modify applicable rules of confidentiality.

(2) Providers, upon request of the department, shall allow timely access to a provider’s records and facilities in order to conduct a financial, fiscal, performance, or program audit.

(3) Providers shall allow the department immediate access to program information or access to a facility if the deputy director of the children and family services division of the department serves the provider with notice that, in the opinion of the deputy director, the immediate access to a facility or program information is required based on one of the following conditions or circumstances:

(A) A temporary suspension order has been served on a provider.

(B) Based on reliable evidence, the department has a valid basis for believing that proceedings have been, or will shortly
 be, instituted against a provider in a state or federal court for purposes of determining whether the provider is insolvent or bankrupt under appropriate state or federal law.

(C) A provider is, or will shortly be, taking action that might reasonably hinder or defeat the department’s ability to collect overpayments in the future.

(4) The department shall adopt regulations that specify timeframes and penalties for failure to submit requested information or allow facility access that may include reduction or termination of the AFDC-FC rate. Penalties shall not be imposed until the provider has been given a reasonable opportunity to respond or provide access.

(b) The department shall apply and enforce only those statutes, regulations, all-county letters, or similar written directives, that are made available to
 providers, in writing, for any period for which a rate is effective.

(c) The department shall consult with representatives of providers concerning the development of those standards and the modification of existing standards. Providers shall receive written notice of, and have the opportunity to comment upon, new and modified standards proposed by the department.

(d) The department shall make available to providers, in writing, any new or modified standards prior to the beginning of the period upon which a rate is calculated, if possible, or as quickly as it is administratively practical to do so. Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), in the event of an unanticipated circumstance or unusual expenditure, the department may exercise its discretion in interpreting what is an allowable or a reasonable expenditure. However, the department shall make those interpretations available
 to providers, in writing, as quickly as it is practical to do so.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific Sections 11466 to 11469.3, inclusive, as those sections read on the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, by means of all-county letters or similar written directives, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. The all-county letters or similar written directives shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations, no later than January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 35.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.2.

(a) (1) The department shall perform or have performed provider program and fiscal audits as needed. Provider programs shall maintain all child-specific, programmatic, personnel, fiscal, and other information or records affecting ratesetting and AFDC-FC payments for a period of not less than five years, except that information and records shall be kept for a longer period of time if otherwise required by law.

(2) Provider fiscal audits shall be conducted pursuant to Part 200 (commencing with Section 200.0) of Chapter II of Subtitle A of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as implemented by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in Part
 75 (commencing with Section 75.1) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including uniform administrative requirements, cost principles, and audit requirements, as specifically implemented in Section 75.106 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A provider may request a hearing of the department’s program or fiscal audit determination under this section no later than 30 days after the date the department issues its audit determination. A provider may request a hearing to examine any disputed audit determination, including, but not limited to, an audit finding regarding the provider’s internal controls, board of directors oversight, program operation, or a finding that results in an overpayment. The department’s audit determination shall be final if the provider does not request a hearing within the prescribed time.
 Within 60 days of receipt of the request for hearing, the department shall conduct a hearing on the audit determination. The standard of proof shall be the preponderance of the evidence and the burden of proof shall be on the department. The hearing officer shall issue the proposed decision within 45 days of the close of the evidentiary record. The department shall adopt, reject, or modify the proposed decision, or refer the matter back to the hearing officer for additional evidence or findings within 100 days of issuance of the proposed decision. If the department takes no action on the proposed decision within the prescribed time, the proposed decision shall take effect by operation of law.

(b) (1) The department shall develop regulations to require corrective action to a program’s or provider’s operation as a result of
 program or fiscal audit findings, to adjust the rate, and to recover any overpayments resulting from an overstatement of the projected level of care and services or overpayments or disallowed costs resulting from other audit findings.

(2) Any repeat fiscal audit findings may result in a monetary penalty or rate reduction, suspension, or termination of the provider’s rate in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, all-county letters, or similar written instructions.

(c) (1) In any audit conducted by the department, the department, or other public or private audit agency with which the department contracts, shall coordinate with the department’s licensing and ratesetting entities so that a consistent set of standards, rules, and auditing protocols
 are maintained. The department, or other public or private audit agency with which the department contracts, shall make available to all providers, in writing, any standards, rules, and auditing protocols to be used in those audits.

(2) The department shall provide exit interviews with providers, whenever deficiencies are found, and shall explain the deficiencies and permit providers an opportunity to respond. The department shall adopt regulations, all-county letters, or similar written directives specifying the procedure for the appeal of program and fiscal audit findings.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from revoking the license of, or initiating legal proceedings against, a provider that has violated relevant laws and
 regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 80.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.21.

(a) In accordance with subdivision (b), as a condition to receive an AFDC-FC rate for a foster care program operated by a provider, as defined in Section 11466, the following shall apply:

(1) Any provider who expends in combined federal funds an amount at or above the federal funding threshold in accordance with the federal Single Audit Act, as amended, and Section 200.501 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as implemented by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in Section 75.501 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall arrange to have a financial audit conducted on an annual basis, and shall submit the financial audit to the
 department in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, all-county letter, or similar written instructions.

(2) Any provider who expends in combined federal funds an amount below the federal funding threshold shall annually submit a financial audit to the department pursuant to Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS), and shall submit the financial audit to the department in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, all-county letter, or similar written instructions.

(3) The scope of the financial audit shall include all of the programs and activities operated by the provider and shall not be limited to those funded in whole or in part by the AFDC-FC program. The financial audits shall include, but not be limited to, an
 evaluation of the expenditures and accounting and control systems of the provider.

(4) The provider shall have its financial audit conducted by certified public accountants or by state-licensed public accountants, with audit designation, who have no direct or indirect relationship with the functions or activities being audited, or with the provider, its board of directors, or other governing body, officers, or staff.

(5) The provider shall have its financial audits conducted in accordance with Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States and in compliance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to private entities organized and operated on a nonprofit basis.

(6) (A) Each provider shall have the flexibility to define the calendar months included in its fiscal year.

(B) A provider may change the definition of its fiscal year. However, the financial audit conducted following the change shall cover all of the months since the last audit, even though this may cover a period that exceeds 12 months.

(b) (1) In accordance with subdivision (a), as a condition to receive an AFDC-FC rate, a provider shall submit a copy of its most recent financial audit report, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(2) The department shall terminate the rate of a provider who fails to submit a copy of its most recent financial audit pursuant to
 subdivision (a). A terminated rate shall only be reinstated upon the provider’s submission to the department of an acceptable financial audit.

(3) A new provider that has been incorporated for fewer than 12 calendar months shall not be required to submit a copy of a financial audit to receive an AFDC-FC rate for a new program. The financial audit shall be conducted on the provider’s next full fiscal year of operation. The provider shall submit the financial audit to the department in accordance with subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall issue a management decision letter on audit findings resulting from a financial audit, made by the independent auditor or as a result of department review, within six months of receipt of the financial audit report. The management decision
 letter shall clearly state whether or not the audit finding is sustained, the reasons for the decision, and the action or actions expected of the nonprofit organization provider to repay disallowed costs, make financial adjustments, or take other action.

(d) Repeated late submission of financial audits, repeat findings in financial audits, or failure to comply with corrective action in a management decision letter may result in monetary penalties or a reduction, suspension, or termination of the provider’s rate in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, all-county letter, or similar written instructions. This subdivision shall not be construed to affect the department’s authority under other provisions of law, including, but not limited to, Part 200 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as implemented by the United States
 Department of Health and Human Services in Part 75 (commencing with Section 75.1) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) The procedures for the departmental appeal and hearing
 process set forth in Section 11466.2 shall apply for audit findings in a management decision letter resulting from a financial audit pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 81.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.22.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure overall program integrity in the AFDC-FC program through the establishment of an effective and efficient process for the collection of provider sustained overpayments. Furthermore, the intent of the Legislature is to ensure that children placed in AFDC-FC programs, including, but not limited to, group homes, short-term residential therapeutic programs, and foster family agencies, receive the level of care and supervision commensurate with the program’s paid rate.

(b) The department may collect a sustained overpayment from the party responsible for the sustained overpayment, regardless of whether the party remains in
 the business of providing any AFDC-FC programs, and regardless of whether the provider remains licensed by the department.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a provider overpayment is an overpayment that results from an audit period when a provider receives a rate reimbursement to which it is not entitled. If a provider receives a rate reimbursement to which it is not entitled, including, but not limited to, the provider failing to maintain a license, or failing to maintain its status as a nonprofit organization, or due to an overpayment determined as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), it shall be liable to repay the overpayment.

(d) (1) Overpayments shall be determined by a provider audit pursuant to Section 11466.21, a department audit conducted pursuant
 to Section 11466.2, a management decision letter, or a provider self-reporting an overpayment. A self-reported overpayment may include a finding in the financial audit report submitted by the provider whether that finding is formally made in the financial audit report or discovered through department review of the report or other provider submission.

(2) If a hearing is not requested, or on the 60th day after an informal decision if a provider or the department does not file a notice of intent to file a formal appeal, or on the 30th day following a formal appeal hearing decision, whichever is latest, a provider overpayment shall be sustained for collection purposes and the department shall issue a demand letter for repayment of the sustained overpayment.

(3) The department shall
 establish a voluntary repayment agreement procedure with a maximum repayment period of nine years. The procedure shall take into account the amount of the overpayment, projected annual income of the program that caused the overpayment, a minimum repayment amount, including principal and interest, of 3 percent of annual income prorated on a monthly basis, simple interest for the first seven years of the voluntary repayment agreement on the overpayment amount based on the Surplus Money Investment Fund, and simple interest for the eighth and ninth years of the voluntary repayment agreement based on the prime rate at that time plus 3 percent. The department may consider renegotiation of a voluntary repayment agreement if the department determines that the agreement would cause severe harm to children in placement.

(4) The department
 shall establish an involuntary overpayment collection procedure, that shall take into account the amount of the overpayment, projected annual income, a minimum required repayment amount, including principal and interest, of 5 percent of the annual income prorated on a monthly basis, simple interest on the overpayment amount based on the Surplus Money Investment Fund, and a maximum repayment period of seven years. The department may consider renegotiation of an involuntary payment agreement if the department determines that the agreement would cause severe harm to children in placement.

(e) The department shall maintain, by regulation, all-county letter, or similar written directive, a procedure for recovery of any provider sustained overpayments. The department shall prioritize collection methods, which shall include voluntary repayment agreement
 procedures, involuntary overpayment collection procedures, including the use of a statutory lien, rate request denials, rate decreases, and rate terminations. The department may also deny rate requests, including requests for rate increases, or program changes or expansions, while an overpayment is due. The department shall seek recovery of provider sustained overpayments in a manner that does not jeopardize overall availability of placements for foster children.

(f) Whenever the department determines that a provider sustained overpayment has occurred, the department shall recover from the provider the full amount of the sustained overpayment, and simple interest on the sustained overpayment amount, pursuant to methods described in subdivision (e), against the provider’s income or assets.

(g) If a provider is successful in its appeal of a collected overpayment, it shall be repaid the collected overpayment plus simple interest based on the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 82.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.23.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to comply with the federal requirements of the Improper Payments Act of 2002 with respect to the remittance of the federal share of foster care or adoption assistance overpayments.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “foster care or adoption assistance overpayment” means any amount of aid paid to which a foster care provider or adoption assistance recipient was not entitled, including any overpayment identified by a foster care provider as described in Section 11400, or federal Adoption Assistance Program recipient as described in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, and on and after the date that the director executes
 a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, any federal Kin-GAP aid paid to which a related guardian was not entitled, including any overpayment identified by a federal Kin-GAP recipient as described in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385).

(c) Counties shall be required to remit the appropriate amount of federal funds upon identification of the overpayment, following the completion of due process.

(1) For overpayments identified prior to July 1, 2012, counties shall not be required to repay the overpayment when any of the following occurs:

(A) The amount is legally uncollectible, including any amount legally uncollectible pursuant to Section 11466.24.

(B) The cost of collection exceeds the overpayment.

(C) The provider is no longer in business or licensed by the department.

(2) For overpayments identified prior to July 1, 2012, remittance of overpayments of federal AFDC-FC, federal Kin-GAP, and federal AAP funds not excluded by paragraph (1) shall be shared by the state and the counties based on the following sharing ratios:

(A) For federal AFDC-FC funds, the sharing ratios described in subdivision (c) of Section 15200.

(B) For federal Kin-GAP funds, the sharing ratios described in Section 10101.2.

(C) For federal AAP funds, the sharing
 ratios described in subdivision (e) of Section 15200.

(d) (1) For overpayments identified on and after July 1, 2012, the county shall pay 100 percent of the cost for remittance of all overpayments of federal AFDC-FC, federal Kin-GAP, and federal AAP funds.

(2) For overpayments identified prior to July 1, 2012, upon actual collection of any overpayments from providers or recipients, the county shall ensure that the total amount reimbursed to the state reflects the federal and state share of the overpayment costs, as specified. All overpayments of federal AFDC-FC, federal Kin-GAP, and federal AAP funds included in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be repaid completely with state funds.

(3) For overpayments identified on and after July 1, 2012, after remitting the federal share, the county shall retain any funds collected by the county from overpaid providers or recipients.

(4) Nothing in this section shall inhibit existing county authority to collect overpayments.

(5) Nothing in this section shall inhibit existing county responsibility to remit voluntary overpayments upon collection.

(e) (1) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section by December 31, 2008. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, in consultation and coordination with the County Welfare Directors Association, may adopt
 emergency regulations to implement this section.

(2) The adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(f) The department may only require counties to remit payment of the federal share for overpayments upon identification that occur on or after the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 83.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.235.

(a) The department, in consultation and coordination with the County Welfare Directors Association (CWDA), shall update existing regulations and establish new regulations where lacking for the identification, determination, tracking, notification, and collection of foster care and adoption assistance overpayments by county agencies to foster care providers or adoption assistance recipients, and shall specify the required actions of county agencies, as appropriate, to recoup overpayments. In addition, the department, in consultation with the
 CWDA, shall develop specific processes to implement collection and repayment of overpaid federal AFDC-FC funds, including the development of a Notice of Action (NOA), due process procedures, voluntary repayment procedures, involuntary repayment procedures, and the accrual of interest. It is the intent of the Legislature that the recovery of unauthorized funds is done in a manner that does not jeopardize overall availability of placements for foster or adoptive children or the best interests of the foster or adoptive child.

(b) (1) No later than October 1, 2007, the department shall implement a process to obtain all necessary state approvals of advanced planning documents for counties to implement automated solutions designed to minimize overpayments, and to submit the documents to the appropriate federal authority within 30 days of original submission by the county to the state. The process shall include a template to be
 used by counties for expedited state and federal approval of advanced planning documents designed to minimize overpayments.

(2) No later than December 31, 2007, the department shall implement a process for counties to obtain, at no charge, all necessary data from the Child Welfare Services Case Management System (CWS/CMS) to implement automated solutions designed to minimize overpayments, such as the system used by Alameda County, or a similar solution. The department shall notify the budget committees of the Legislature and the CWDA by October 1, 2007, if the department believes that the extract of this data could jeopardize the structural and data integrity of the information within the CWS/CMS. The department shall work with CWDA to mitigate these risks, if found.

(c) (1) The department shall modify existing regulations and adopt new regulations to
 implement this section by December 31, 2008. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, in consultation with the CWDA, may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section.

(2) The adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 177, Sec. 33.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.24.

(a) In accordance with this section, a county shall collect an overpayment, discovered on or after January 1, 1999, made to a foster family home, an approved home of a relative, including, on and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, the home of a Kin-GAP guardian, an approved home of a nonrelative extended family member, an approved home of a nonrelative legal guardian, a resource family, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16519.5, or the supervised independent living setting where a nonminor dependent resides, for any period of time in which the foster child was not cared for in that home, unless any of the following conditions exist, in which case a county shall not collect the overpayment:

(1) The cost of the collection exceeds that amount of the overpayment that is likely to be recovered by the county. The cost of collecting the overpayment and the likelihood of collection shall be documented by the county. Costs that the county shall consider when determining the cost-effectiveness to collect are total administrative, personnel, legal filing fee, and investigative costs, and any other applicable costs.

(2) The child was temporarily removed from the home and payment was owed to the provider to maintain the child’s placement, or the child was temporarily absent from the provider’s home, or on runaway status and subsequently returned, and payment was made to the provider to meet the child’s needs.

(3) The overpayment was exclusively the result of a county administrative error or both the county welfare
 department and the provider or nonminor dependent were unaware of the information that would establish that the foster child or nonminor dependent was not eligible for foster care benefits.

(4) The provider or nonminor dependent did not have knowledge of, and did not contribute to, the cause of the overpayment.

(b) (1) After notification by a county of an overpayment to a foster family home, an approved home of a relative, including the home of a Kin-GAP guardian, or a nonrelative extended family member, approved home of a nonrelative legal guardian, a resource family, or the supervised independent living setting where the nonminor dependent resides, and a demand letter for repayment, the foster parent, approved relative, approved nonrelative legal guardian, resource family, or nonminor dependent may request the county welfare department to review the
 overpayment determination in an informal hearing, or may file with the department a request for a hearing to appeal the overpayment determination. Requesting an informal hearing shall not preclude a payee from seeking a formal hearing at a later date. The county welfare department shall dismiss the overpayment repayment request if it determines the action to be incorrect through an initial review prior to a state hearing, or through a review in an informal hearing held at the request of the foster parent, relative, nonrelative legal guardian, or nonminor dependent.

(2) If an informal hearing does not result in the dismissal of the overpayment, or a formal appeal hearing is not requested, or on the 30th day following a formal appeal hearing decision, whichever is later, the foster family provider overpayment shall be sustained for collection purposes.

(3) The department shall adopt
 regulations that ensure that the best interests of the child or nonminor dependent shall be the primary concern of the county welfare director in any repayment agreement.

(c) (1) The department shall develop regulations for recovery of overpayments made to any foster family home, approved home of a relative, including the home of a Kin-GAP guardian, approved home of a nonrelative legal guardian, resource family, or supervised independent living setting where a nonminor dependent resides. The regulations shall prioritize collection methods, that shall include voluntary repayment agreement procedures and involuntary overpayment collection procedures. These procedures shall take into account the amount of the overpayment and a minimum required payment amount.

(2) A county shall not collect an overpayment through the use of an involuntary payment agreement unless
 a foster family home, an approved home of a relative, including the home of a Kin-GAP guardian, approved home of a nonrelative legal guardian, resource family, or supervised independent living setting where a nonminor dependent resides has rejected the offer of a voluntary overpayment agreement, or has failed to comply with the terms of the voluntary overpayment agreement.

(3) A county shall not be permitted to collect an overpayment through the offset of payments due to a foster family home, an approved home of a relative, including the home of a Kin-GAP guardian, approved home of a nonrelative legal guardian, resource family, or supervised independent living setting where a nonminor dependent resides, unless this method of repayment is requested by the provider or nonminor dependent in a voluntary repayment agreement, or other circumstances defined by the department by regulation.

(d) If a provider or nonminor dependent is successful in its appeal of a collected overpayment, it shall be repaid the collected overpayment plus simple interest based on the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(e) A county may not collect interest on the repayment of an overpayment.

(f) There shall be a one-year statute of limitations from the date upon which the county determined that there was an overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 107.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.25.

Interest begins to accrue on a provider overpayment or penalty on the date of the issuance of the penalty, the date of issuance of the final audit report, or the date of the issuance of a management decision letter in accordance with Section 11466.21, or the date that a provider self-reports an overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 108.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11466.3.
